Florida, session 2026, SB678.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 52 53 Section 1.âSection 561.1215, Florida Statutes, is created 54 to read: 55 561.1215âDeductions for breakage, spoliation, evaporation, 56 expiration, and extraordinary losses.â 57 (1)(a)âDeductions against any excise tax due under s. 58 563.05, s. 564.06, or s. 565.12 are allowed for unsalable 59 alcoholic beverages. Distributors of vinous, spirituous, or 60 malted beverages may make an excise tax deduction to their 61 monthly tax report for alcoholic beverages that have become 62 unsalable through warehouse breakage, spoliation, evaporation, 63 or expiration or that have become unfit for human consumption in 64 an amount equal to the following: 65 1.âFor vinous sales, 0.49 percent of gross tax. 66 2.âFor spirituous beverage sales, 0.15 percent of gross 67 tax. 68 3.âFor malt beverage sales, 0.20 percent of gross tax or 69 the actual breakage or spoliation. 70 (b)âSuch breakage or spoliation must be documented by an 71 employee of the division or other authorized person. 72 (c)âThe method of determining breakage for malt beverages, 73 either percentage or actual gallonage, must be elected annually 74 and will be effective for 1 calendar year unless the license is 75 transferred or 100 percent of the stock is sold to a new owner. 76 (d)âDistributors that distribute more than one type of 77 alcoholic beverage shall deduct the gross taxes for their 78 products as prescribed in this subsection for vinous, 79 spirituous, or malt beverages. 80 (2)(a)âExtraordinary losses of vinous, spirituous, or malt 81 beverages are excluded from the deductions in subsection (1). 82 For purposes of this section, the term âextraordinary lossâ 83 means an unusual loss resulting from acts of God or nature which 84 are not expected to recur; accidents that occur during 85 interstate or intrastate shipment from manufacturer to 86 distributor, from distributor to distributor, or from 87 distributor to retailer; or products being recalled by a 88 manufacturer and destroyed by a distributor. The term does not 89 include a loss from evaporation, breakage, or spoliation 90 incurred on the licensed premises in the normal course of 91 business which exceeds the standard deductions prescribed in 92 subsection (1). 93 (b)âA distributor shall immediately notify the division 94 when an extraordinary loss occurs. A distributor may deduct the 95 actual gallonage of the extraordinary loss. The distributor 96 shall show proof of the extraordinary loss before recovering or 97 crediting any excise tax due to the unsalable alcoholic 98 beverages by: 99 1.âProviding a copy of a traffic accident investigation 100 report or an incident report from the investigating agency when 101 the loss occurs in transit; 102 2.âHaving the extraordinary loss witnessed or documented by 103 an authorized division employee when the extraordinary loss 104 occurs on the premises of the distributor; or 105 3.âClearly and objectively establishing the extraordinary 106 loss through appropriate documentation as determined by the 107 division. 108 (c)âThe distributor shall show proof of the destruction, 109 dumping, or recycling of the alcoholic beverages involved in the 110 extraordinary loss by providing a statement to the division from 111 the distributor, or the distributorâs authorized employee or 112 agent, evidencing such destruction, dumping, or recycling. The 113 statement must include a description of the location of the 114 extraordinary loss; the alcoholic beverages, by gallonage and 115 tax category, which have been destroyed, dumped, or recycled; 116 and the location of the site where the alcoholic beverages were 117 destroyed, dumped, or recycled. 118 (3)(a)âUpon notification by a distributor, the division 119 shall inspect any remaining undamaged invoiced inventory 120 intended to be distributed. 121 (b)1.âA distributor reporting extraordinary losses must 122 furnish proof that the excise tax has not been recovered from 123 any other source. The distributor shall provide the division 124 with copies of all insurance claims and receipts of payment upon 125 request by the division. 126 2.âThe distributor shall record on forms prescribed by the 127 division the actual gallonage of breakage, spoliation, or 128 evaporation of alcoholic beverages and the date of product 129 destruction, quantity destroyed by tax classification, and a 130 statement signed by the distributor, or the distributorâs 131 authorized employee or agent, that the product was destroyed. 132 3.âThe division shall retain all completed forms for 3 133 years. 134 (4)âThe division may adopt rules and forms to implement 135 this section. 136 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.